District of Columbia statutes.
50-2421.14

Effect of the repeal of provisions.

Any repeal of a law or regulation by this subchapter or section 13 of D.C. Law 15-35 shall not invalidate any enforcement action, adjudication, or any other action made or taken pursuant to such law or regulation.

Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 14, 50 DCR 6579
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 14 of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).